tugas morphology/indo.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +A +I +T +P me+

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Adjective ;

LEXICON Noun

data		N;
sikat		N;
fitnah		N;
verifikasi	N;
rampok		N;
nafkah		N;
wadah		N;

LEXICON Verb

kirim	V;
ikat	V;
goreng	V;
hilang	V;
curi  	V;
pasang	V;
tanam	V;
jahit	V;
lihat	V;

LEXICON Adjective

zalim	A;
beku	A;
yakin	A;

LEXICON N

+N+T:0		#;

LEXICON V

+V+T:0		#;

LEXICON A

+A+I:i		#;
+A+I:0		#;
